Washington statutes.
RCW 18.46.005

Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to provide for the development, establishment, and enforcement of standards for the maintenance and operation of birthing centers, which, in the light of advancing knowledge, will promote safe and adequate care and treatment of the individuals therein.

[ 2000 c 93 s 29; 1951 c 168 s 1.]